Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2602.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1327.2(a.1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, amended November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1327.2. Attendance Policy at Charter, Regional Charter and Cyber Charter Schools.--* * *(a.1) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a 1234567891011121314151617181920 cyber charter school shall include in its attendance policy the following:(1) (i) A policy to determine when a child has an unexcused or excused absence or is present for synchronous instruction. To be present for synchronous instruction, a child must be present and visible to the teacher on camera at all times during each synchronous instructional period for each course[.], with exceptions allowed for brief, teacher-directed or teacher-approved breaks. If a student fails to maintain continuous live visual presence during instructional time, excluding any teacher-directed or teacher-approved break period, the student shall be deemed to have an absence for that class period.(ii) The policy under subparagraph (i) shall establish a procedure for a cyber charter school to notify a parent or guardian if the student fails to follow attendance requirements for synchronous instruction.(iii) A secondary school student enrolled in a cyber charter school is not required to comply with subparagraph (i) for courses in which the student is dually enrolled and attending in person or virtually at a postsecondary institution. The postsecondary institution shall verify attendance for each student enrolled in the course and shall report all absences to the cyber charter school.(2) A prohibition specifying that a cyber charter school administrator or chief administrator may not alter an attendance record taken by a teacher, unless the alteration corrects an error.(3) A policy to determine when a child has an unexcused or excused absence or is present for asynchronous instruction. To be present for asynchronous instruction, a child must complete 20260HB2602PN3582 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 weekly benchmarks. The following requirements shall apply to the weekly benchmarks:(i) A cyber charter school shall establish weekly benchmarks for students participating in asynchronous instruction and shall submit the weekly benchmarks to the department for approval by [June 30] March 1 of each year for the following school year. If the department has not approved, denied or returned the weekly benchmarks within forty-five (45) days, the weekly benchmarks shall be deemed approved for the following school year.(ii) The weekly benchmarks must be sufficient to demonstrate the student is making adequate and consistent progress toward completion of each course in which the student is enrolled. The cyber charter school's attendance policy shall define adequate and consistent progress and include the consequence for failure to make adequate and consistent progress. Each cyber charter school shall establish a procedure to notify a parent or guardian if the student fails to make adequate and consistent progress.(iii) If a student does not complete the weekly benchmark, the student shall receive an absence or other consequence in accordance with the policy under this paragraph.(iv) The cyber charter school may not receive payment under section 1725-A or 1725.1-A until the cyber charter school receives a notice of approval of its synchronous instruction attendance policy or asynchronous instruction attendance policy.(v) Failure of a cyber charter school to comply with this paragraph shall be sufficient cause for nonrenewal or revocation of the charter.* * *(d) For cyber charter schools under subsection (a.1), no 20260HB2602PN3582 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop and publish on its publicly accessible Internet website:(1) A standardized form and evaluation criteria for synchronous instruction attendance policies to submit to the department for approval.(2) A standardized form and evaluation criteria for asynchronous instruction attendance policies to submit to the department for approval.(e) A cyber charter school shall submit the attendance policies and completed standardized form developed in accordance with this section to the department by August 1 of each year.(f) A cyber charter school that fails to submit each policy by August 1, or that fails to receive approval after submitting one synchronous instruction attendance policy or one asynchronous instruction attendance policy, shall be subject to the following:(1) The cyber charter school shall not receive payment under section 1725-A or 1725.1-A until the cyber charter school receives a notice of approval of its synchronous instruction attendance policy or asynchronous instruction attendance policy.(2) The failure shall be sufficient cause for nonrenewal or revocation of the charter.Section 2. Section 1743-A(d) introductory paragraph, (3), (5) and (10) of the act are amended to read:Section 1743-A. Cyber charter school requirements and prohibitions.* * *(d) Parent or guardian.--[Upon request and prior to the student's first day in a cyber charter school,] At the time of a 20260HB2602PN3582 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student's enrollment and at the beginning of each school year thereafter, the cyber charter school shall, either in writing or electronically, provide to the parent or guardian of a student the following:* * *(3) The manner in which attendance will be reported and work will be authenticated[.], including the attendance policy for students participating in synchronous instruction and asynchronous instruction.* * *(5) The meetings to be held during the school year between a parent or guardian and a teacher and among other school officials or parents or guardians, including mandatory meetings in the case of a missed weekly wellness check without prior excused absence notification in accordance with section 1748.1-A, and the manner in which the parent or guardian will be notified of the time and place for the meeting.* * *(10) Copies of policies relating to computer security and privacy, truancy, absences, wellness checks, child protection and support plans, discipline and withdrawal or expulsion of students.* * *Section 3. Section 1748.1-A of the act, amended or added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55) and November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended to read:Section 1748.1-A. Enrollee wellness checks.(a) Requirements.--A cyber charter school shall, at least once during any week consisting of at least three full or 20260HB2602PN3582 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 partial days of academic instruction, conduct individual wellness checks to ensure that each enrolled student is visibly seen and communicated with in real time by a teacher, administrator or other representative of the cyber charter school, either in person or via electronic means, in order to ensure the well-being of the student and verify participation in the educational program. [The requirement under this subsection may be satisfied by students turning on a webcam during synchronous online instruction.] The following apply to the wellness checks:(1) Participation in virtual or face-to-face health screenings, standardized testing or tutoring shall count toward fulfilling a weekly wellness check under this subsection.(2) Upon one failed weekly wellness check without an excused absence, the cyber charter school shall schedule a mandatory follow-up meeting with the following individuals to re-establish engagement:(i) The student.(ii) The student's parent or guardian.(iii) A certified school counselor, certified school psychologist, school social worker, school teacher or school administrator.(3) If the cyber charter school has failed to make contact with the student during a required wellness check and mandatory follow-up meeting in the case of a missed weekly wellness check under this section, the cyber charter school shall conduct an in-person home visit or coordinate a local law enforcement welfare check to visually verify the child's safety.20260HB2602PN3582 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A cyber charter school administrator or chief administrator may not alter any attendance record for wellness checks after the wellness check is performed, unless the alteration corrects an error.(b) Report.--(1) E ach cyber charter school shall maintain documentation of completed wellness checks, including the date and method of each wellness check for each student, subject to the requirements of 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights). The cyber charter school shall make the document available to the department upon request.(2) If any indication of abuse, neglect or harm to a child is observed, the cyber charter school administrator, employee or representative shall report the concerns in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services).(c) Wellness policy.--[Each] No later than June 30 of each year for the following school year, each cyber charter school shall submit to the department for approval a wellness check policy that demonstrates compliance with subsections (a) and (b).(d) Student verification.--The department may require proof of compliance with this section from a cyber charter school to ensure the well-being of a student enrolled in the cyber charter school and to verify attendance in the educational program.(e) Noncompliance.--Failure to comply with this section or failure to receive approval after submitting one wellness check policy or one asynchronous instruction attendance policy may result in the department taking the following actions:20260HB2602PN3582 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Requiring the cyber charter school to report to the department the date, time and method of each wellness check for each student.(2) Mandating teachers, administrators and staff of the cyber charter school to complete child abuse recognition, prevention and reporting training annually.(3) Requiring the cyber charter school to meet in person with each student at least once during the school year following the school year in which the cyber charter school is out of compliance with this section.(4) Prohibiting a cyber charter school from being awarded a State grant by the department until the cyber charter school demonstrates compliance with subsections (a) and (b).(5) Imposing a fine of not more than $15,000 per incident.(f) Charter.--A failure described in subsection (e) shall be sufficient cause for nonrenewal or revocation of the charter of the cyber charter school.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1752-A. Child protection and support plan.(a) Purpose.--Each cyber charter school shall adopt and implement a child protection and support plan to serve as a structured protocol for identifying, responding to and reporting signs of suspected child abuse, self-harm and other serious or urgent student wellness or safety concerns in accordance with 23 Pa. C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services). (b) Activation.--A plan shall be activated upon identification of a wellness trigger during a required wellness check under section 1748.1-A, during any direct or virtual 20260HB2602PN3582 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contact with students , OR by other means of communication to the cyber charter school or if a student does not attend a mandatory meeting in the case of a missed weekly wellness check without prior excused absence notification . (c) Contents.--A plan must include the following:(1) The following circumstances shall constitute a wellness trigger and immediately initiate the child protection and support plan:(i) Indications or reports of child abuse.(ii) Reports of students exhibiting suspected self- harm or suicide risk factors or warning signs as provided under section 1526.(iii) Signs of acute physical or mental health deterioration, substance abuse, psychosis or other SUBSTANCE ABUSE OR behaviors suggesting urgent psychiatric needs.(2) Upon the identification of a wellness trigger, the cyber charter school shall promptly notify the parent or guardian. This notification may be reasonably delayed, subject to the requirements of 23 Pa.C.S. § 6368 (relating to investigation of reports). The following apply:(i) If the child is suspected of being a victim of child abuse, the school employee or other mandated reporter under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6311 (relating to persons required to report suspected child abuse) shall comply with 23 Pa.C.S. § 6313 (relating to reporting procedure).(ii) If the child is exhibiting self-harm or suicide risk factors or warning signs as provided under section 1526, the school employee or other mandated reporter shall comply with section 1302-E.20260HB2602PN3582 - 9 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) If the child is exhibiting substance abuse or behaviors suggesting urgent psychiatric needs, the school employee or other mandated reporter shall comply with 22 Pa. Code § 12.42 (relating to student assistance program).(d) Development and posting.--No later than 90 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall develop and post on its publicly accessible Internet website guidelines for cyber charter schools to submit a plan for approval.(e) Submittal AND REVISION of plan.-- No later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, a A cyber charter school shall submit a plan for approval by the department . (f) Reviewing and revising.--No later than August 1 each year, a BY AUGUST 1, 2026. EACH AUGUST 1 THEREAFTER, EACH cyber charter school shall annually review its plan and submit any revisions to the department for approval.(g) (F) Activations.-- (1) Each cyber charter school shall maintain activations of the child protection and support plan, and the date each wellness trigger was identified.(2) The information maintained under this subsection shall be made available in an aggregated format to the department upon request.(3) The information maintained under this subsection shall not contain a reporting source of SUSPECTED child abuse or personal identifying information of a student. (4) The information maintained under this subsection must include the following:20260HB2602PN3582 - 10 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The number of times that the plan was activated annually, categorized by circumstance listed in accordance with subsection (c)(1).(ii) T he number of employees in the cyber charter school who have completed mandatory training under section 1310-B.(iii) The number of employees in the cyber charter school who have received a waiver for the mandatory training under section 1310-B.(h) (G) Penalties.-- (1) A cyber charter school that fails to submit a plan, or fails to receive approval after submitting a plan, shall be subject to the withholding of payment under section 1725-A or 1725.1-A until the cyber charter school receives a notice of approval of its plan.(2) In addition to the penalty under paragraph (1), failure to comply with any provision of this section shall subject a cyber charter school to a fine of not more than $15,000 per incident.(3) A failure described under this subsection shall be sufficient cause for nonrenewal or revocation of the charter of the cyber charter school.(i) (H) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child abuse." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303(b.1) (relating to definitions)."Plan." A child protection and support plan described in subsection (a)."School employee." An individual who is employed by a school 20260HB2602PN3582 - 11 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or who provides a program, activity or service sponsored by a school. The term does not include administrative or other support personnel who have no direct contact with children."Student assistance program." As defined in 22 Pa. Code § 12.16 (relating to definitions).Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2602PN3582 - 12 - 123456